csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Cnj_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwegwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaagwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziinigwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziigwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaangen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwangen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwiingen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowegwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaagwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminigwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamogwen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaangen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowangen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowiingen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaambaanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandanziiwegibanen,waabandanziiwegobanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwambanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaagobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziinigobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziigobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwaangibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwangibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziiwiingibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaambaanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamowegibanen,waabandamowegobanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowambanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaagobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminigobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamogobanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaangibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowangibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wabandamowiingibanen
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziweg
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigwaa
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzinig
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzig
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaang
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwang
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzing
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandameg
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaman
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaad
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminid
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandang
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaang
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamang
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaming
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaambaan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandanziwegiban,waabandanziwegoban]
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwamban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigwaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzinigoban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzigoban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwaangiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanziwangiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandanzingiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaambaan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [waabandamegiban,waabandamegoban]
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamamban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamowaapan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: waabandaminipan
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: waabandangiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamaangiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamangiban
     waabandam+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: waabandamingiban
